Illinois, session 104th, HB1133.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Spending Reduction and Revenue Control Act. 6    Section 5. Passage of new taxation or increased taxation 7bills prohibited. The General Assembly shall not pass any bill 8that either (i) creates new State taxes or (ii) increases 9existing State taxes until an appropriation bill or bills are 10passed that, in the aggregate, represent a reduction in the 11spending levels from the previous fiscal year. 12    Section 10. Agency revenue reduction plan. Every State 13agency shall submit to the General Assembly a recommended list 14of spending efficiencies and budget reductions they deem 15necessary in order to help the General Assembly comply with 16the provisions of this Act. 17    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 18becoming law.